Utah statutes.
23-20-25.   Exhibition of license, permit, tag or device required -- Misdemeanor.

(1)  Any person while engaged in any activity regulated under this title, shall be required upon demand of any conservation officer or any other peace officer to exhibit:

(a)  the required license, permit, or tag;

(b)  any device or apparatus in that person's possession used for any activity regulated under this title; or

(c)  any wildlife in that person's possession.

(2)  Any conservation officer who has a reasonable belief that a person is engaged in any activity regulated under this title may stop and temporarily detain that person in order to demand and inspect:

(a)  the required license, permit, or tag;

(b)  any device or apparatus in that person's possession used for any activity regulated under this title; or

(c)  any wildlife in that person's possession.

(3)  Any person who fails to produce for examination to an officer any of the required licenses, permits, tags, devices or apparatuses used for any activity regulated under this title or any wildlife in that person's possession is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 208, 1994 General Session

